Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-407
Campus buildings and facilities; refunding bonds; authorized.

For the purpose of refunding any revenue bonds which may have been issued under the provisions of sections 85-403 to 85-411 and then outstanding, or for the purpose of refunding any indebtedness on the parking buildings and facilities of such institutions or on dormitories or other facilities for the housing, boarding, and activities of students, faculties, and employees of the institutions under the control of the boards issued under the provisions of Chapter 85, article 4, the boards are authorized to issue revenue refunding bonds in the same manner as herein provided for the issuance of revenue bonds.

Laws 1955, c. 352, § 5, p. 1077;

Laws 1965, c. 581, § 5, p. 1876.